tests/училище.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах училище":
    училище<n><nom> :  училище 
    училище<n><gen> :  училищӗн 
    училище<n><dat> :  училищӗне 
    училище<n><loc> :  училищӗре 
    училище<n><abl> :  училищӗрен 
    училище<n><ins> :  училищӗпе 
    училище<n><abe> :  училищӗсӗр 
    училище<n><ben> :  училищӗшӗн
    училище<n><px1sg><nom> :  училищӗм 
    училище<n><px1sg><gen> :  училищӗмӗн 
    училище<n><px1sg><dat> :  училищӗме 
    училище<n><px1sg><loc> :  училищӗмре 
    училище<n><px1sg><abl> :  училищӗмрен 
    училище<n><px1sg><ins> :  училищӗмпе 
    училище<n><px1sg><abe> :  училищӗмсӗр 
    училище<n><px1sg><ben> :  училищӗмшӗн
    училище<n><px2sg><nom> :  училищӳ 
    училище<n><px2sg><gen> :  училищӳн 
    училище<n><px2sg><dat> :  училищӳне 
    училище<n><px2sg><loc> :  училищӳнте 
    училище<n><px2sg><abl> :  училищӳнтен 
    училище<n><px2sg><ins> :  училищӳпе 
    училище<n><px2sg><abe> :  училищӳсӗр 
    училище<n><px2sg><ben> :  училищӳшӗн
    училище<n><px3sp><nom> :  училищи 
    училище<n><px3sp><gen> :  училищин 
    училище<n><px3sp><dat> :  училищине 
    училище<n><px3sp><loc> :  училищинче 
    училище<n><px3sp><abl> :  училищинчен 
    училище<n><px3sp><ins> :  училищипе 
    училище<n><px3sp><abe> :  училищисӗр 
    училище<n><px3sp><ben> :  училищишӗн
    училище<n><px1pl><nom> :  училищӗмӗр 
    училище<n><px1pl><gen> :  училищӗмӗрӗн 
    училище<n><px1pl><dat> :  училищӗмӗре 
    училище<n><px1pl><loc> :  училищӗмӗрте 
    училище<n><px1pl><abl> :  училищӗмӗртен 
    училище<n><px1pl><ins> :  училищӗмӗрпе 
    училище<n><px1pl><abe> :  училищӗмӗрсӗр 
    училище<n><px1pl><ben> :  училищӗмӗршӗн
    училище<n><px2pl><nom> :  училищӗр 
    училище<n><px2pl><gen> :  училищӗрӗн 
    училище<n><px2pl><dat> :  училищӗре 
    училище<n><px2pl><loc> :  училищӗрте 
    училище<n><px2pl><abl> :  училищӗртен 
    училище<n><px2pl><ins> :  училищӗрпе 
    училище<n><px2pl><abe> :  училищӗрсӗр 
    училище<n><px2pl><ben> :  училищӗршӗн
    училище<n><pl><nom> :  училищӗсем 
    училище<n><pl><gen> :  училищӗсен 
    училище<n><pl><dat> :  училищӗсене 
    училище<n><pl><loc> :  училищӗсенче 
    училище<n><pl><abl> :  училищӗсенчен 
    училище<n><pl><ins> :  училищӗсемпе 
    училище<n><pl><abe> :  училищӗсемсӗр 
    училище<n><pl><ben> :  училищӗсемшӗн
    училище<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  училищӗмсем 
    училище<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  училищӗмсен 
    училище<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  училищӗмсене 
    училище<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  училищӗмсенче 
    училище<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  училищӗмсенчен 
    училище<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  училищӗмсемпе 
    училище<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  училищӗмсемсӗр 
    училище<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  училищӗмсемшӗн
    училище<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  училищӳсем 
    училище<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  училищӳсен 
    училище<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  училищӳсене 
    училище<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  училищӳсенче 
    училище<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  училищӳсенчен 
    училище<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  училищӳсемпе 
    училище<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  училищӳсемсӗр 
    училище<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  училищӳсемшӗн
    училище<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  училищисем 
    училище<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  училищисен 
    училище<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  училищисене 
    училище<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  училищисенче 
    училище<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  училищисенчен 
    училище<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  училищисемпе 
    училище<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  училищисемсӗр 
    училище<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  училищисемшӗн
    училище<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  училищӗмӗрсем 
    училище<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  училищӗмӗрсен 
    училище<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  училищӗмӗрсене 
    училище<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  училищӗмӗрсенче 
    училище<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  училищӗмӗрсенчен 
    училище<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  училищӗмӗрсемпе 
    училище<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  училищӗмӗрсемсӗр 
    училище<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  училищӗмӗрсемшӗн
    училище<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  училищӗрсем 
    училище<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  училищӗрсен 
    училище<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  училищӗрсене 
    училище<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  училищӗрсенче 
    училище<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  училищӗрсенчен 
    училище<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  училищӗрсемпе 
    училище<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  училищӗрсемсӗр 
    училище<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  училищӗрсемшӗн
